Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2626
Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Act, how cited.

Sections 43-2626 to 43-2639 shall be known and may be cited as the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Act.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 30.